pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Myślistwo i strzelectwo > Łowiectwo: Akcesoria do pułapek na zwierzęta; Pułapki na zwierzynę; Wózki i nosidła do transportu zwierzyny; Sprzęt do obróbki i patroszenia zwierzyny w terenie; Wzmacniacze słuchu; Akcesoria do czatowni myśliwskich; Osłony myśliwskie; Sprzęt dla psów myśliwskich; Mapy i przewodniki myśliwskie; Akcesoria do ambon nadrzewnych; Ambony; Akcesoria do paśników dla dzikiej zwierzyny; Karmniki dla dzikiej zwierzyny; Wabiki na zwierzynę
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Caccia e tiro a segno > Caccia: Accessori per trappole per animali; Trappole per animali; Carrelli e trasportini per selvaggina; Attrezzatura per lavorazione ed eviscerazione della selvaggina; Amplificatori acustici; Accessori per capanni da caccia; Capanni e paravento da caccia; Attrezzatura per cani da caccia; Mappe e guide da caccia; Accessori per altane da caccia; Postazioni da albero; Accessori per mangiatoie per selvaggina; Mangiatoie per animali selvatici; Esche per animali selvatici
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 打猎与射击 > 狩猎用品: 动物陷阱配件; 捕猎工具; 猎物运输车与背架; 猎物加工与野外处理设备; 听力增强装置; 狩猎掩体配件; 狩猎帐篷/护障; 猎犬用具; 狩猎地图与指南; 狩猎树架配件; 树架; 野生动物喂食器配件; 野生动物自动喂食器; 狩猎引诱剂
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Poľovníctvo a streľba > Poľovníctvo: Príslušenstvo k pasciam na zvieratá; Pasce na zver; Vozíky a prepravky na zver; Zariadenia na spracovanie a úpravu zveri; Zariadenia na zlepšenie sluchu; Príslušenstvo pre lovecké úkryty; Poľovnícke rolety a zásteny; Vybavenie pre poľovníckych psov; Poľovnícke mapy a sprievodcovia; Príslušenstvo k posedom; Šplhacie posedy; Príslušenstvo pre kŕmidlá pre divú zver; Kŕmidlá pre divú zver; Vnadiace zmesi pre divú zver
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Vânătoare și tir > Vânătoare: Accesorii pentru capcane de animale; Capcane pentru animale; Cărucioare și sisteme de transport pentru vânat; Echipament pentru eviscerarea și procesarea vânatului; Amplificatoare de auz; Accesorii pentru paravane de vânătoare; Corturi și ecrane de camuflaj pentru vânătoare; Echipament pentru câini de vânătoare; Hărți și ghiduri de vânătoare; Accesorii pentru standuri de vânătoare suspendate; Standuri copaci; Accesorii pentru hrănitoare de vânat; Dispozitive pentru hrănire pentru animale sălbatice; Atractanți pentru animale sălbatice
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Jakt og skyting > Jakt: Tilbehør til dyrefeller; Dyrefeller; Vilttraller og -bærere; Utstyr for slakting og partering av vilt; Høreapparater; Tilbehør til jaktskjul; Jaktblinds og -skjermer; Utstyr for jakthunder; Jaktkart og guider; Tilbehør til jakttårn; Jakttårn; Tilbehør til fôrautomater for vilt; Fôrsystemer; Lokkemidler
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Medžioklė ir šaudymas > Medžioklė: Gyvūnų gaudyklių priedai; Spąstai gyvūnams; Medžioklės laimikio vežimėliai ir nešyklės; Žvėrienos apdorojimo ir dorojimo įranga; Klausos stiprintuvai; Medžioklinių slėptuvių priedai; Medžioklės slėptuvės ir širmos; Įranga medžiokliniams šunims; Medžioklės žemėlapiai ir vadovai; Medžioklinių bokštelių priedai; Medžioklės platformos; Laukinių gyvūnų šėryklų priedai; Laukinių žvėrių šėryklos; Gyvūnų viliojimo priemonės
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การล่าสัตว์และยิงปืน > มีดพราน: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับกับดักสัตว์; กับดักสัตว์; รถเข็นและอุปกรณ์ขนย้ายสัตว์ที่ล่าได้; อุปกรณ์แล่เนื้อและชำแหละสัตว์; เครื่องช่วยฟัง; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับซุ้มบังพรางล่าสัตว์; ที่อำพรางสำหรับล่าสัตว์; อุปกรณ์สำหรับสุนัขล่าสัตว์; แผนที่และคู่มือล่าสัตว์; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับที่นั่งซุ่มยิงบนต้นไม้; ห้างล่าสัตว์; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเครื่องให้อาหารสัตว์ป่า; เครื่องให้อาหารในเกมล่าสัตว์; อุปกรณ์ล่อสัตว์ป่า
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Vadászat és lövészet > Vadászat: Állatcsapda-kiegészítők; Állatcsapdák; Vadszállító kocsik és hordozók; Vadfeldolgozó és zsigerelő felszerelések; Hallásjavítók; Lessátor-kiegészítők; Vadászati redőnyök és paravánok; Vadászkutya-felszerelés; Vadásztérképek és -útmutatók; Fára szerelhető les-kiegészítők; Faállványok; Vadetető-kiegészítők; Vadetetők; Vadvonzók
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Охота и стрельба > Охота: Аксессуары для капканов и ловушек на животных; Клетки-ловушки для животных; Тележки и переноски для дичи; Оборудование для разделки и обработки дичи; Наушники с усилителями звука; Аксессуары для охотничьих засидок; Охотничьи скрадки; Снаряжение для охотничьих собак; Охотничьи карты и справочники; Аксессуары для тристендов; Лабазы; Аксессуары для кормушек для диких животных; Кормушки для диких животных; Товары для привлечения диких животных
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Jagen en schieten > Jagen: Accessoires voor dierenvallen; Dierenvallen; Wildkarren en -dragers; Uitrusting voor wildverwerking en ontweien; Gehoorverbeteraars; Accessoires voor jachtschermen; Camouflagehutten en -netten; Uitrustingen voor jachthonden; Jachtkaarten en -gidsen; Accessoires voor hoogzitten; Hoogzit; Accessoires voor wildvoeders; Voerbakken voor wild; Lokmiddelen voor wild
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Caça e tiro > Caça: Acessórios para armadilhas de animais; Armadilhas para animais; Carrinhos e sacos de transporte de caça; Equipamento de processamento e preparação de caça; Intensificador de audição; Acessórios para abrigos de caça; Abrigos e esconderijos para caça; Equipamento para cães de caça; Mapas e guias de caça; Acessórios para plataformas de árvore; Cadeira para árvore; Acessórios para alimentadores de caça; Alimentadores para animais selvagens; Atrator para animais selvagens
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Metsästys ja ammunta > Metsästys: Eläinloukkujen lisävarusteet; Eläinten loukut; Riistakärryt ja -kantovälineet; Riistan käsittely- ja suolistusvälineet; Korvan äänenvahvistimet; Piilokojujen lisävarusteet; Metsästysteltat ja -suojat; Metsästyskoiratarvikkeet; Metsästyskartat ja -oppaat; Passilavojen lisävarusteet; Puuhun kiinnitettävät metsästystelineet; Riistaruokintalaitteiden lisävarusteet; Riistan ruokinta-astiat; Villieläinten houkuttelu
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Avcılık ve Atıcılık > Avcılık: Hayvan kapanı aksesuarları; Hayvan Tuzakları; Av arabaları ve taşıyıcıları; Av eti işleme ve temizleme ekipmanları; Atış Kulaklıkları; Av gümesi aksesuarları; Av Kamuflaj Kulübe ve Örtüleri; Av Köpeği Malzemeleri; Av haritaları ve rehberleri; Ağaç standı aksesuarları; Ağaç Tepesi Oturakları; Yabani hayvan yemliği aksesuarları; Vahşi Hayvan Yemlikleri; Vahşi Hayvan Tuzak Yemleri
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Săn bắn > Dao đi săn: Phụ kiện bẫy động vật; Bẫy động vật; Xe kéo & túi vận chuyển thú săn; Thiết bị sơ chế thú săn; Micro tăng cường thính lực; Phụ kiện lều ngụy trang đi săn; Rèm & màn săn bắn; Thiết bị cho chó đi săn; Bản đồ & sách hướng dẫn săn bắn; Phụ kiện giá ngồi trên cây; Ghế săn bắn treo cây; Phụ kiện máy cho động vật hoang dã ăn; Dụng cụ cho thú săn ăn; Chất hấp dẫn động vật hoang dã
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Jagt og skydning > Jagt: Tilbehør til dyrefælder; Dyrefælder; Vildtvogne og -bærere; Udstyr til vildtbehandling og opbrækning; Hørelsesforbedring; Tilbehør til skydeskjul; Jagtskjul og camouflagenet; Jagthundeudstyr; Jagtkort og -guides; Tilbehør til skydestiger; Jagttårne; Tilbehør til foderautomater til vildt; Foderstationer; Vildtlokkemidler
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Лов и стрелба > Лов: Аксесоари за капани за животни; Капани за животни; Транспортни средства и приспособления за пренасяне на дивеч; Оборудване за обработка и разфасоване на дивеч на място; Слушалки за подобряване на звука; Аксесоари за ловни щори; Ловни заслони и паравани; Оборудване за ловни кучета; Ловни карти и ръководства; Аксесоари за стойки за лов от дърво; Стойки за дървета; Аксесоари за хранилки за дивеч; Хранилки за дивеч; Продукти за привличане на диви животни
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Caza y tiro > Caza: Accesorios para trampas de animales; Trampas para animales; Carros y transportadores de caza; Equipamiento para procesamiento de presas y desollado en el campo; Audífonos para cazadores; Accesorios para puestos de caza; Pantallas y puestos de caza; Equipo para perro de caza; Mapas y guías de caza; Accesorios para puestos de árbol; Puestos para árboles; Accesorios para comederos de animales salvajes; Comederos para animales de caza; Atrayente para animales
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사냥/사격 > 사냥: 동물 덫 액세서리; 동물용 덫; 사냥감 카트 및 캐리어; 사냥감 처리 및 해체 장비; 사냥용 보청기; 사냥용 블라인드 액세서리; 사냥용 가리개/스크린; 사냥견 장비; 사냥 지도 및 가이드; 트리 스탠드 액세서리; 트리 스탠드; 야생동물 먹이통 액세서리; 야생 사냥감 먹이 공급기; 야생동물 유인제
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lov a střelba > Lov: Příslušenství k pastím na zvířata; Zvířecí pasti; Vozíky a nosiče na zvěř; Vybavení na zpracování úlovku; Lovecká naslouchátka; Příslušenství k loveckým krytům; Lovecké přístřešky a zástěny; Potřeby pro lovecké psy; Lovecké mapy a průvodci; Příslušenství k přenosným posedům na strom; Posedy; Příslušenství ke krmelcům pro divokou zvěř; Krmelce pro zvěř; Lovecké atraktanty
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Lov i streljaštvo > Lov: Dodaci za zamke za životinje; Zamke za životinje; Kolica i nosači divljači; Oprema za preradu i obradu divljači na terenu; Sredstva za poboljšanje sluha; Dodaci za lovačke šatore; Lovački šatori i zasloni; Oprema za lovačke pse; Karte i vodiči za lov; Dodaci za lovačke čeke na drveću; Lovačke čeke na drveću; Pribor za hranilice za divljač; Hranilice za divljač; Privlačne tvari za divlje životinje
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κυνήγι & σκοποβολή > Κυνήγι: Αξεσουάρ παγίδων ζώων; Παγίδες ζώων; Καρότσια και φορείς μεταφοράς θηραμάτων; Εξοπλισμός επεξεργασίας και καθαρισμού θηραμάτων; Ενισχυτές ακοής; Αξεσουάρ φυλαχτρών κυνηγιού; Κυνηγετικό καμουφλάζ & οθόνες; Εξοπλισμός για κυνηγετικά σκυλιά; Χάρτες και οδηγοί κυνηγιού; Αξεσουάρ για βάσεις κυνηγιού σε δέντρα; Βάσεις δέντρων για κυνήγι; Αξεσουάρ ταϊστρών άγριων ζώων; Ταΐστρες άγριων ζώων; Ελκυστικά προϊόντα για άγρια ζώα
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Caça e tiro > Caça: Acessórios para armadilhas de animais; Armadilhas para animais; Carrinhos e bolsas de transporte de caça; Equipamentos para processamento e limpeza de caça; Aparelhos auditivos para caça; Acessórios para tendas de caça; Camuflagem e redes para caça; Equipamentos para cães de caça; Mapas e guias de caça; Acessórios para assentos de árvore para caça; Abrigos em árvores para caça; Acessórios para alimentadores de animais selvagens; Alimentadores para animais selvagens; Produtos para atrair animais selvagens
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 打獵和射擊 > 狩獵: 動物陷阱配件; 動物誘捕器; 獵物搬運車與搬運帶; 獵物處理與野外清理設備; 助聽器; 狩獵掩體配件; 狩獵帳/偽裝網; 獵犬裝備; 狩獵地圖與指南; 樹架配件; 爬樹架; 野生動物餵食器配件; 野生動物餵食器; 野生動物誘捕用品
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Lov in streljanje > Lov: Dodatki za pasti za živali; Pasti za živali; Vozički za divjad; Oprema za predelavo in čiščenje divjadi na terenu; Slušni ojačevalniki; Dodatki za lovske zaklone; Lovski zakloni in pregrade; Oprema za lovske pse; Lovski zemljevidi in vodniki; Dodatki za stojala za drevesa; Stojala za drevesa; Dodatki za krmilnice za divjad; Krmilniki za divjad; Privabljala za divjad
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Chasse et tir > Chasse: Accessoires de pièges à animaux; Pièges pour animaux; Chariots et civières à gibier; Équipement de traitement du gibier et d’éviscération; Oreillettes amplificatrices; Accessoires d'affûts de chasse; Postes d'affût de chasse; Accessoires pour chiens de chasse; Cartes et guides de chasse; Accessoires de miradors; Postes de chasse; Accessoires d'agrainoirs pour gibier; Mangeoires pour le gibier; Attractifs pour le gibier
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Jagen und Schießen > Jagd: Zubehör für Tierfallen; Tierfallen; Wildwagen & -träger; Ausrüstung zur Wildverarbeitung & zum Aufbrechen; Jagdverstärker; Zubehör für Tarnzelte; Jagdansitze & Tarnung; Jagdhund-Ausrüstung; Jagdkarten & -führer; Zubehör für Hochsitze; Hochsitze; Zubehör für Wildfutterautomaten; Wildfutterautomaten; Lockmittel für Wild
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 狩猟・射撃 > 狩猟: 動物用トラップアクセサリー; 動物捕獲器・罠; 獲物用カート＆キャリア; 獲物の解体＆処理設備; 狩猟用補聴器; ハンティングブラインドアクセサリー; 狩猟用迷彩ブラインド; 狩猟犬用品; ハンティング用マップ＆ガイド; ツリースタンドアクセサリー; 狩猟用ツリースタンド; 野生動物用給餌器アクセサリー; 野生動物用餌箱; 野生動物用誘引剤
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Hunting & Shooting > Hunting: Animal Trap Accessories; Animal Traps; Game Carts & Carriers; Game Processing & Field Dressing Equipment; Hearing Enhancers; Hunting Blind Accessories; Hunting Blinds & Screens; Hunting Dog Equipment; Hunting Maps & Guides; Tree Stand Accessories; Tree Stands; Wild Game Feeder Accessories; Wild Game Feeders; Wildlife Attractants
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Jakt och skytte > Jakt: Tillbehör för djurfällor; Djurfällor; Viltvagnar och bärutrustning; Utrustning för viltköttshantering och passning; Hörselförstärkare; Tillbehör för gömslen; Jaktgömslen och skärmar; Utrustning för jakthundar; Jaktkartor och guider; Tillbehör för trädpass; Trädställningar; Tillbehör för viltfoderautomater; Utfodrare för vilt; Lockmedel för vilt